Hawaii statutes.
§467B-3 Reciprocal agreements. The
attorney general may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the appropriate
authority of another state for the purpose of exchanging information with
respect to charitable organizations, professional fundraising counsel,
professional solicitors, and commercial co-venturers. [L 1969, c 167, pt of §1;
am L 1993, c 206, §4; am L 1996, c 120, §1; am L 2004, c 93, §4; am L 2013, c
61, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next